Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB213.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly hereby declares that it shall be the policy of the
Commonwealth that all retail electric suppliers subject to the jurisdiction of the
commission, except for distribution cooperatives organized under KRS Chapter
279, shall procure electric generation capacity sufficient to meet customer
demand in a manner that:
(a) Uses a competitive and open process;
(b) Prioritizes safe, secure, reliable, and resilient electricity service at the lowest
possible reasonable cost of forecasted estimates; and
(c) Allows for large customers with new load located in the service territory of
retail electric suppliers without sufficient electric generation capacity, or
with the retail electric supplier's consent, to determine whether they want to
take service from competitive retail suppliers or the relevant retail electric
supplier.
(2) Retail electric suppliers subject to this section shall conduct an integrated
resource planning process every three (3) years in order to ensure that each retail
electric supplier:
(a) Meets regulatory policies mandated by this chapter and the rules, and the
administrative regulations promulgated thereunder;
(b) Engages interested parties in the planning process, provides detailed
information about system planning to interested parties, and accounts for
information provided by interested parties;
(c) Discloses its planning models and methods to interested parties and to the
commission;
Page 1 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
(d) Accounts for and explains risks and opportunities in its system planning,
including those related to fuel costs, technology development, and wholesale
markets;
(e) Considers third-party and customer-owned supply resources and demand-
side management resources and programs on a comparable basis with
utility-owned resources; and
(f) Develops an integrated resource plan that reflects a scenario-based, least-
regrets approach and provides the utility with optionality, aligned with the
public interest, if actual conditions do not match forecasted expectations.
(3) Retail electric suppliers shall maintain adequate service through owning or
contracting for sufficient electric generation capacity to meet, with reasonable
reserves, customer demand.
(4) Within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this Act, the
commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A requiring retail electric suppliers to file an integrated resource plan
with the commission triennially, unless the retail electric supplier is a distribution
company with less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in annual revenue or a
distribution cooperative organized under KRS Chapter 279. In lieu of an
integrated resource plan, distribution cooperatives organized under KRS Chapter
279 and subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall be presumed to have
met the requirements herein by entering into and maintaining contracts with a
generation and transmission cooperative organized under KRS Chapter 279 for
all of their energy, capacity, and transmission needs.
(5) Integrated resource plans shall include the utility's resource assessment and
acquisition plan for providing an adequate and reliable supply of electricity to
meet forecasted electricity requirements at the lowest reasonable cost of
forecasted estimates.
Page 2 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
(6) The commission shall not allow the retail electric suppliers required to file
integrated resource plans under this section to purchase any meaningful capacity
or energy for any prolonged period of time from regional transmission
organizations or independent system operators to satisfy the requirements of this
section.
(7) The commission may require generation and transmission cooperatives organized
under KRS Chapter 279 to adhere to administrative regulations promulgated by
the commission pursuant to this section regarding integrated resource plans and
the use of the all-requirements contracts.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The exclusive privilege conferred to each retail electric supplier to furnish retail
electric service within its certified territory pursuant to Section 6 of this Act shall
be a property right of the Commonwealth.
(2) In any proceeding on an application filed pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of
Section 7 of this Act regarding the acquisition, sale, or transfer of control of a
retail electric supplier, the commission shall:
(a) Consider the amount paid in excess of the retail electric supplier's net book
value to represent the value of the privilege conferred by Section 6 of this
Act; and
(b) Have the authority, in consideration of subsection (13) of Section 7 of this
Act to determine what amount of the proposed purchase price in excess of
net book value, if any, should be paid to the customers of the retail electric
supplier.
(3) As the privilege conferred to retail electric suppliers is a property right of the
Commonwealth, the commission may require any excess of net book value
proposed to be paid for the sale, acquisition, or transfer of control of the electric
Page 3 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
retail supplier to be returned to customers of the retail electric supplier in the
form and manner prescribed by the commission.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 278 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning on June 30, 2027, and notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, prospective customers of retail electric suppliers where the retail electric
suppliers that represent additional and incremental electric generating load in
excess of fifty (50) megawatts at a single site may choose to obtain retail electric
service from an entity other than the retail electric supplier designated by law
provided the retail electric supplier:
(a) Is not an electric distribution cooperative organized pursuant to KRS
Chapter 279; and
(b) Does not own sufficient capacity to serve current peak customer demand as
of January 1, 2026.
(2) With the electric distribution cooperative's written consent, prospective customers
located in the service territory of the relevant electric distribution cooperative that
represents additional and incremental load at a single site in excess of fifty (50)
megawatts may choose to obtain retail electric service from an entity other than
the distribution cooperative retail electric supplier.
(3) This designation of the prospective retail electric service provider by the retail
customer shall be made:
(a) Only one (1) time; and
(b) Prior to obtaining retail electric service for the load in question at the single
designated site.
(4) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A effectuating this section. The administrative regulations shall
include appropriate cost recovery mechanisms for network direct and shared
Page 4 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
expenses incurred because of or on behalf of these new customers. The
commission shall ensure that customers of relevant retail electric suppliers are
indifferent to or benefitted by new customers exercising their choice in retail
electric service.
Section 4. KRS 278.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 278.010 to 278.450, 278.541 to 278.544, 278.546 to 278.5462, and
278.990, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Corporation" includes private, quasipublic, and public corporations, and all boards,
agencies, and instrumentalities thereof, associations, joint-stock companies, and
business trusts;
(2) "Person" includes natural persons, partnerships, corporations, and two (2) or more
persons having a joint or common interest;
(3) "Utility" means any person except a regional wastewater commission established
pursuant to KRS 65.8905 and, for purposes of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of
this subsection, a city, who owns, controls, operates, or manages any facility used
or to be used for or in connection with:
(a) The generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electricity to or
for the public, for compensation, for lights, heat, power, or other uses;
(b) The production, manufacture, storage, distribution, sale, or furnishing of
natural or manufactured gas, or a mixture of same, to or for the public, for
compensation, for light, heat, power, or other uses;
(c) The transporting or conveying of gas, crude oil, or other fluid substance by
pipeline to or for the public, for compensation;
(d) The diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing, or furnishing
of water to or for the public, for compensation;
(e) The transmission or conveyance over wire, in air, or otherwise, of any
message by telephone or telegraph for the public, for compensation; or
Page 5 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
(f) The collection, transmission, or treatment of sewage for the public, for
compensation, if the facility is a subdivision collection, transmission, or
treatment facility plant that is affixed to real property and is located in a
county containing a city of the first class or is a sewage collection,
transmission, or treatment facility that is affixed to real property, that is
located in any other county, and that is not subject to regulation by a
metropolitan sewer district or any sanitation district created pursuant to KRS
Chapter 220;
(4) "Retail electric supplier" means any person, firm, corporation, association, or
cooperative corporation, excluding municipal corporations, engaged in the
furnishing of retail electric service;
(5) "Certified territory" shall mean the areas as certified by and pursuant to KRS
278.017;
(6) "Existing distribution line" shall mean an electric line which on June 16, 1972, is
being or has been substantially used to supply retail electric service and includes all
lines from the distribution substation to the electric consuming facility but does not
include any transmission facilities used primarily to transfer energy in bulk;
(7) "Retail electric service" means electric service furnished to a consumer for ultimate
consumption, but does not include wholesale electric energy furnished by an
electric supplier to another electric supplier for resale;
(8) "Electric-consuming facilities" means everything that utilizes electric energy from a
central station source;
(9) "Generation and transmission cooperative" or "G&T" means a utility formed under
KRS Chapter 279 that provides electric generation and transmission services;
(10) "Distribution cooperative" means a utility formed under KRS Chapter 279 that
provides retail electric service;
(11) "Facility" includes all property, means, and instrumentalities owned, operated,
Page 6 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
leased, licensed, used, furnished, or supplied for, by, or in connection with the
business of any utility;
(12) "Rate" means any individual or joint fare, toll, charge, rental, or other compensation
for service rendered or to be rendered by any utility, and any rule, regulation,
practice, act, requirement, or privilege in any way relating to such fare, toll, charge,
rental, or other compensation, and any schedule or tariff or part of a schedule or
tariff thereof;
(13) "Service" includes any practice or requirement in any way relating to the service of
any utility, including the voltage of electricity, the heat units and pressure of gas,
the purity, pressure, and quantity of water, and in general the quality, quantity, and
pressure of any commodity or product used or to be used for or in connection with
the business of any utility, but does not include Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP)
service;
(14) "Adequate service" means having sufficient capacity, including generating
capacity, to meet the maximum estimated requirements of the customer to be
served during the year following the commencement of permanent service and to
meet the maximum estimated requirements of other actual customers to be supplied
from the same lines or facilities across each[during such] year and to assure such
customers of reasonable continuity of service;
(15) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission of Kentucky;
(16) "Commissioner" means one (1) of the members of the commission;
(17) "Demand-side management" means any conservation, load management, or other
utility activity intended to influence the level or pattern of customer usage or
demand, including home energy assistance programs;
(18) "Affiliate" means a person that controls or that is controlled by, or is under common
control with, a utility;
(19) "Control" means the power to direct the management or policies of a person
Page 7 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
through ownership, by contract, or otherwise;
(20) "CAM" means a cost allocation manual which is an indexed compilation and
documentation of a company's cost allocation policies and related procedures;
(21) "Nonregulated activity" means the provision of competitive retail gas or electric
services or other products or services over which the commission exerts no
regulatory authority;
(22) "Nonregulated" means that which is not subject to regulation by the commission;
(23) "Regulated activity" means a service provided by a utility or other person, the rates
and charges of which are regulated by the commission;
(24) "USoA" means uniform system of accounts which is a system of accounts for
public utilities established by the FERC and adopted by the commission;
(25) "Arm's length" means the standard of conduct under which unrelated parties, each
party acting in its own best interest, would negotiate and carry out a particular
transaction;
(26) "Subsidize" means the recovery of costs or the transfer of value from one (1) class
of customer, activity, or business unit that is attributable to another;
(27) "Solicit" means to engage in or offer for sale a good or service, either directly or
indirectly and irrespective of place or audience;
(28) "USDA" means the United States Department of Agriculture;
(29) "FERC" means the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;
(30) "SEC" means the Securities and Exchange Commission;
(31) "Commercial mobile radio services" has the same meaning as in 47 C.F.R. sec. 20.3
and includes the term "wireless" and service provided by any wireless real time two
(2) way voice communication device, including radio-telephone communications
used in cellular telephone service, personal communications service, and the
functional or competitive equivalent of a radio-telephone communications line used
in cellular telephone service, a personal communications service, or a network radio
Page 8 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
access line;[ and]
(32) "Voice over Internet Protocol" or "VoIP" has the same meaning as in federal law;
and
(33) "Integrated resource plan" means a utility assessment of how to cost effectively
meet forecasted demand over a specified future period in a manner that plan
provides resource planners with a way of evaluating plausible future resource
needs, resource uses, risks, and reliability.
Section 5. KRS 278.016 is amended to read as follows:
It is hereby declared to be in the public interest that, in order to encourage the orderly
development of retail electric service, to avoid wasteful duplication of distribution
facilities, to avoid unnecessary encumbering of the landscape of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, to prevent the waste of materials and natural resources, for the public
convenience and necessity and to minimize disputes between retail electric suppliers
which may result in inconvenience, diminished efficiency and higher costs in serving the
consumer, the state be divided into geographical areas, establishing the areas within
which each retail electric supplier has the privilege[is] to provide the retail electric
service as provided in KRS 278.016 to 278.020 and, except as otherwise provided, no
retail electric supplier shall furnish retail electric service in the certified territory of
another retail electric supplier.
Section 6. KRS 278.018 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided herein, each retail electric supplier shall have the
exclusive privilege[right] to furnish retail electric service to all electric-consuming
facilities located within its certified territory, and shall not furnish, make available,
render or extend its retail electric service to a consumer for use in electric-
consuming facilities located within the certified territory of another retail electric
supplier; provided that any retail electric supplier may extend its facilities through
the certified territory of another retail electric supplier, if such extension is
Page 9 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
necessary for such supplier to connect any of its facilities or to serve its consumers
within its own certified territory. In the event that a new electric-consuming facility
should locate in two (2) or more adjacent certified territories, the commission shall
determine which retail electric supplier shall serve said facility based on criteria in
KRS 278.017(3).
(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (5) of this section, any new electric-
consuming facility located in an area which has not as yet been included in a map
issued by the commission, pursuant to KRS 278.017(2), or certified, pursuant to
KRS 278.017(4), shall be furnished retail electric service by the retail electric
supplier which has an existing distribution line in closer proximity to such electric-
consuming facility than is the nearest existing distribution line of any other retail
electric supplier. Any disputes under this subsection shall be resolved by the
commission.
(3) The commission may, after a hearing had upon due notice, make such findings as
may be supported by proof as to whether any retail electric supplier operating in a
certified territory is rendering or proposes to render adequate service to an electric-
consuming facility and in the event the commission finds that such retail electric
supplier is not rendering or does not propose to render adequate service, the
commission may enter an order specifying in what particulars such retail electric
supplier has failed to render or propose to render adequate service and order that
such failure be corrected within a reasonable time, such time to be fixed in such
order.
(4) The commission may, after a hearing had upon due notice, make such findings
as may be supported by evidence as to whether any retail electric supplier is not
rendering adequate service as a result of having insufficient electric generation
capacity to meeting the customer demand in accordance with Section 1 of this
Act. If the commission finds that the retail electric supplier is not rendering or
Page 10 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
does not propose to render adequate service, the commission may enter an order:
(a) Specifying how the retail electric supplier has failed to render or has not
proposed to render adequate service; and
(b) Requiring the failure be corrected within a reasonable time as determined
by the commission and fixed in the order.
(5) If, pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the retail electric supplier so
ordered to correct such failure fails to comply with such order, the commission may
authorize another retail electric supplier or competitive retail supplier to furnish
retail electric service to the facilities within the initial retail electric supplier's
certified territory necessary to ensure each facility is provided adequate
service[such facility].
(6)[(4)] Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no retail electric supplier
shall furnish, make available, render or extend retail electric service to any electric-
consuming facility to which such service is being lawfully furnished by another
retail electric supplier on June 16, 1972, or to which retail electric service is
lawfully commenced thereafter in accordance with this section by another retail
electric supplier.
(7)[(5)] The provisions of KRS 278.016 to 278.020 shall not preclude any retail
electric supplier from extending its service after June 16, 1972, to property and
facilities owned and operated by said retail electric supplier.
(8)[(6)] Notwithstanding the effectuation of certified territories established by or
pursuant to KRS 278.016 to 278.020, and the exclusive right to service within such
territory, a retail electric supplier may contract with another retail electric supplier
for the purpose of allocating territories and consumers between such retail electric
suppliers and designating which territories and consumers are to be served by which
of said retail electric suppliers. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a
contract between retail electric suppliers as herein provided when approved by the
Page 11 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
commission shall be valid and enforceable. The commission shall approve such a
contract if it finds that the contract will promote the purposes of KRS 278.016 and
will provide adequate and reasonable service to all areas and consumers affected
thereby.
Section 7. KRS 278.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) No person, partnership, public or private corporation, or combination thereof
shall commence providing utility service to or for the public or begin the
construction of any plant, equipment, property, or facility for furnishing to the
public any of the services enumerated in KRS 278.010, except:
1. Retail electric suppliers for service connections to electric-consuming
facilities located within its certified territory;
2. Ordinary extensions of existing systems in the usual course of business;
or
3. A water district created under KRS Chapter 74 or a water association
formed under KRS Chapter 273 that undertakes a waterline extension or
improvement project if the water district or water association is a Class
A or B utility as defined in the uniform system of accounts established
by the commission according to KRS 278.220 and:
a. The water line extension or improvement project will not cost
more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); or
b. The water district or water association will not, as a result of the
water line extension or improvement project, incur obligations
requiring commission approval as required by KRS 278.300.
In either case, the water district or water association shall not, as a result
of the water line extension or improvement project, increase rates to its
customers;
until that person has obtained from the Public Service Commission a
Page 12 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
certificate that public convenience and necessity require the service or
construction.
(b) Upon the filing of an application for a certificate, and after any public hearing
which the commission may in its discretion conduct for all interested parties,
the commission may issue or refuse to issue the certificate, or issue it in part
and refuse it in part, except that the commission shall not refuse or modify an
application submitted under KRS 278.023 without consent by the parties to
the agreement.
(c) The commission, when considering an application for a certificate to construct
a base load electric generating facility, may consider the policy of the General
Assembly to foster and encourage use of Kentucky coal by electric utilities
serving the Commonwealth.
(d) The commission, when considering an application for a certificate to construct
an electric transmission line, may consider the interstate benefits expected to
be achieved by the proposed construction or modification of electric
transmission facilities in the Commonwealth.
(e) Unless exercised within one (1) year from the grant thereof, exclusive of any
delay due to the order of any court or failure to obtain any necessary grant or
consent, the authority conferred by the issuance of the certificate of
convenience and necessity shall be void, but the beginning of any new
construction or facility in good faith within the time prescribed by the
commission and the prosecution thereof with reasonable diligence shall
constitute an exercise of authority under the certificate.
(2) For the purposes of this section, construction of any electric transmission line of
one hundred thirty-eight (138) kilovolts or more and of more than five thousand
two hundred eighty (5,280) feet in length shall not be considered an ordinary
extension of an existing system in the usual course of business and shall require a
Page 13 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
certificate of public convenience and necessity. However, ordinary extensions of
existing systems in the usual course of business not requiring such a certificate shall
include:
(a) The replacement or upgrading of any existing electric transmission line; or
(b) The relocation of any existing electric transmission line to accommodate
construction or expansion of a roadway or other transportation infrastructure;
or
(c) An electric transmission line that is constructed solely to serve a single
customer and that will pass over no property other than that owned by the
customer to be served.
(3) Prior to granting a certificate of public convenience and necessity to construct
facilities to provide the services set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f), the commission
shall require the applicant to provide a surety bond, or a reasonable guaranty that
the applicant shall operate the facilities in a reasonable and reliable manner for a
period of at least five (5) years. The surety bond or guaranty shall be in an amount
sufficient to ensure the full and faithful performance by the applicant or its
successors of the obligations and requirements of this chapter and of all applicable
federal and state environmental requirements. However, no surety bond or guaranty
shall be required for an applicant that is a water district or water association or for
an applicant that the commission finds has sufficient assets to ensure the continuity
of sewage service.
(4) No utility shall exercise any right or privilege under any franchise or permit, after
the exercise of that right or privilege has been voluntarily suspended or
discontinued for more than one (1) year, without first obtaining from the
commission, in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, a certificate of
convenience and necessity authorizing the exercise of that right or privilege.
(5) No utility shall apply for or obtain any franchise, license, or permit from any city or
Page 14 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
other governmental agency until it has obtained from the commission, in the
manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, a certificate of convenience and
necessity showing that there is a demand and need for the service sought to be
rendered.
(6) No person shall acquire or transfer ownership of, or control, or the right to control,
any utility under the jurisdiction of the commission by sale of assets, transfer of
stock, or otherwise, or abandon the same, without prior approval by the
commission. The commission shall grant its approval if the person acquiring the
utility has the financial, technical, and managerial abilities to provide reasonable
service.
(7) No individual, group, syndicate, general or limited partnership, association,
corporation, joint stock company, trust, or other entity (an "acquirer"), whether or
not organized under the laws of this state, shall acquire control, either directly or
indirectly, of any utility furnishing utility service in this state, without having first
obtained the approval of the commission. Any acquisition of control without prior
authorization shall be void and of no effect. As used in this subsection, the term
"control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of a utility, whether through the
ownership of voting securities, by effecting a change in the composition of the
board of directors, by contract or otherwise. Control shall be presumed to exist if
any individual or entity, directly or indirectly, owns ten percent (10%) or more of
the voting securities of the utility. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing
that ownership does not in fact confer control. Application for any approval or
authorization shall be made to the commission in writing, verified by oath or
affirmation, and be in a form and contain the information as the commission
requires. The commission shall approve any proposed acquisition when it finds that
the same is to be made in accordance with law, for a proper purpose and is
Page 15 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
consistent with the public interest. The commission may make investigation and
hold hearings in the matter as it deems necessary, and thereafter may grant any
application under this subsection in whole or in part and with modification and
upon terms and conditions as it deems necessary or appropriate. The commission
shall grant, modify, refuse, or prescribe appropriate terms and conditions with
respect to every such application within sixty (60) days after the filing of the
application therefor, unless it is necessary, for good cause shown, to continue the
application for up to sixty (60) additional days. The order continuing the application
shall state fully the facts that make continuance necessary. In the absence of that
action within that period of time, any proposed acquisition shall be deemed to be
approved.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section shall not apply to any acquisition of control of any:
(a) Utility which derives a greater percentage of its gross revenue from business
in another jurisdiction than from business in this state if the commission
determines that the other jurisdiction has statutes or rules which are applicable
and are being applied and which afford protection to ratepayers in this state
substantially equal to that afforded such ratepayers by subsection (7) of this
section;
(b) Utility by an acquirer who directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more
intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with,
the utility, including any entity created at the direction of such utility for
purposes of corporate reorganization; or
(c) Utility pursuant to the terms of any indebtedness of the utility, provided the
issuance of indebtedness was approved by the commission.
(9) In a proceeding on an application filed pursuant to this section, any interested
person, including a person over whose property the proposed transmission line will
cross, may request intervention, and the commission shall, if requested, conduct a
Page 16 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
public hearing in the county in which the transmission line is proposed to be
constructed, or, if the transmission line is proposed to be constructed in more than
one county, in one of those counties. The commission shall issue its decision no
later than ninety (90) days after the application is filed, unless the commission
extends this period, for good cause, to one hundred twenty (120) days. The
commission may utilize the provisions of KRS 278.255(3) if, in the exercise of its
discretion, it deems it necessary to hire a competent, qualified and independent firm
to assist it in reaching its decision. The issuance by the commission of a certificate
that public convenience and necessity require the construction of an electric
transmission line shall be deemed to be a determination by the commission that, as
of the date of issuance, the construction of the line is a prudent investment.
(10) The commission shall not approve any application under subsection (6) or (7) of
this section for the transfer of control of a utility described in KRS 278.010(3)(f)
unless the commission finds, in addition to findings required by those subsections,
that the person acquiring the utility has provided evidence of financial integrity to
ensure the continuity of sewage service in the event that the acquirer cannot
continue to provide service.
(11) The commission shall not accept for filing an application requesting authority to
abandon facilities that provide services as set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f) or to cease
providing services unless the applicant has provided written notice of the filing to
the following:
(a) Kentucky Division of Water;
(b) Office of the Attorney General; and
(c) The county judge/executive, mayor, health department, planning and zoning
commission, and public sewage service provider of each county and each city
in which the utility provides utility service.
(12) The commission may grant any application requesting authority to abandon
Page 17 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
facilities that provide services as set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f) or to cease
providing services upon terms and conditions as the commission deems necessary
or appropriate, but not before holding a hearing on the application and no earlier
than ninety (90) days from the date of the commission's acceptance of the
application for filing, unless the commission finds it necessary for good cause to act
upon the application earlier.
(13) In a proceeding on an application filed pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of this
section regarding the acquisition, sale, or transfer of control of a retail electric
supplier, the commission shall have the authority to determine whether public
ownership is more beneficial than private ownership, based on which ownership
may achieve lower rates or better service. A determination under this subsection
may include but not be limited to a review of the price paid for the acquisition,
sale, or transfer of control, and the likelihood public ownership would have been
possible based on the sale price. For purposes of this section, a retail electric
supplier organized under KRS Chapter 279 shall be deemed to have public
ownership.
(14) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and to that end the provisions are declared to be severable.
(15) (a) In a proceeding in which a utility seeks a certificate of public convenience
and necessity for generation, the commission, in making its determination
to grant or deny the certificate, may consider the utility's:
1. Adherence to Section 1 of this Act; and
2. Planning processes generally.
(b) While generation and transmission cooperatives organized under KRS
Chapter 279 are not subject to the requirements of Section 1 of this Act, the
Page 18 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
commission may consider the cooperative's planning processes when
making the determination to grant or deny the certificate.
Section 8. KRS 278.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) No utility shall issue any securities or evidences of indebtedness, or assume
any obligation or liability in respect to the securities or evidences of
indebtedness of any other person until it has been authorized so to do by order
of the commission.
(b) In a proceeding where a utility seeks commission approval for any
agreement related to energy or generating capacity pursuant to this section,
the commission, in making its determination to grant or deny the request,
may consider the retail electric supplier's:
1. Adherence to Section 1 of this Act; and
2. Planning processes generally.
(c) While generation and transmission cooperatives organized under KRS
Chapter 279 are not subject to requirements for integrated resource
planning in Section 1 of this Act, the commission may consider the
cooperative's own resource planning processes when making the
determination to grant or deny the certificate.
(2) Application for authority to issue or assume securities or evidences of indebtedness
shall be made in such form as the commission prescribes. Every such application
shall be made under oath, and shall be signed and filed on behalf of the utility by its
president, or by a vice president, auditor, comptroller, or other executive officer
having knowledge of the matters set forth and duly designated by the utility. Every
such application shall be placed at the head of the docket of the commission and
disposed of promptly within sixty (60) days after it is filed with the commission,
unless it is necessary for good cause to continue the application for longer time than
sixty (60) days, in which case the order making the continuance shall state fully the
Page 19 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
facts that make it necessary.
(3) The commission shall not approve any issue or assumption unless, after
investigation of the purposes and uses of the proposed issue and the proceeds
thereof, or of the proposed assumption of obligation or liability, the commission
finds that the issue or assumption is for some lawful object within the corporate
purposes of the utility, is necessary or appropriate for or consistent with the proper
performance by the utility of its service to the public and will not impair its ability
to perform that service, and is reasonably necessary and appropriate for such
purpose.
(4) The commission may grant or deny the application in whole or in part, or may grant
it with such modifications and upon such terms and conditions as the commission
deems necessary or appropriate. The order of the commission shall specify that the
securities or evidences of indebtedness, or the proceeds thereof, shall be used only
for the lawful purposes specified in the application, and both the application of the
utility and the order of the commission shall state in general terms the purpose of
the issuance or assumption.
(5) A copy of any order made and entered by the commission under this section, duly
certified by the executive director of the commission, shall be sufficient evidence
for all purposes of full and complete compliance by the utility with all procedural
and other matters required precedent to the entry of the order.
(6) Securities and evidences of indebtedness issued and obligations and liabilities
assumed by a utility, for which, under the provisions of this section, the
authorization of the commission is required, shall comply with the terms and
conditions of the order of authorization entered prior to the issue or assumption, and
where the order has been fully complied with the validity of the issue or assumption
shall not be affected by a failure to comply with any provision of this section or rule
of the commission relating to procedure or other matters preceding the entry of the
Page 20 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1230
order of authorization or order supplemental thereto.
(7) The commission may require periodical or special reports from the utility issuing
any security or evidence of indebtedness. The report shall show, in such detail as
the commission requires, the disposition made of such securities or evidences of
indebtedness, and the application of the proceeds thereof.
(8) This section does not apply to notes issued by a utility, for proper purposes and not
in violation of law, that are payable at periods of not more than two (2) years from
the date thereof, or to like notes, payable at a period of not more than two (2) years
from date thereof, that are issued to pay or refund in whole or in part any such
notes, or to renewals of such notes from time to time, not exceeding in the
aggregate six (6) years from the date of the issue of the original notes so renewed or
refunded.
(9) Nothing in this section implies any guarantee of securities or evidences of
indebtedness by the state, or any obligation on the part of the state with respect
thereto, and nothing in this section limits the power of any court having jurisdiction
to authorize or cause receiver's certificates or debentures to be issued according to
the rules and practice obtaining in receivership proceedings in courts of equity.
(10) This section does not apply in any instance where the issuance of securities or
evidences of indebtedness is subject to the supervision or control of the federal
government or any agency thereof, but the commission may appear as a party to
any proceeding filed or pending before any federal agency if the issuance of the
securities or evidences of indebtedness will materially affect any utility over which
the commission has jurisdiction.
(11) This section also does not apply to the issuance of securities or evidence of
indebtedness by a utility principally engaged in transportation of gas by pipeline in
interstate commerce and subject to the supervision, control or jurisdiction of the
federal government or any agency, board or commission thereof.
Page 21 of 21
XXXX 2/19/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed